software/EmEditor/Dictionaries/en_us_ru_ru.aff
SFX 29 Y 131
SFX 29   ы    ами          ы
SFX 29   ы    ам           ы
SFX 29   ы    ах           ы
SFX 29   рин  р            рин
SFX 29   оть  тями         оть
SFX 29   оть  тям          оть
SFX 29   оть  тях          оть
SFX 29   оть  тя           оть
SFX 29   оть  ти           оть
SFX 29   оть  тем          оть
SFX 29   оть  тей          оть
SFX 29   оть  те           оть
SFX 29   оть  тю           оть
SFX 29   ок   ку           ок
SFX 29   ок   ков          ок
SFX 29   ок   ком          ок
SFX 29   ок   ки           ок
SFX 29   ок   ке           ок
SFX 29   ок   ками         ок
SFX 29   ок   кам          ок
SFX 29   ок   ках          ок
SFX 29   ок   ка           ок
SFX 29   нин  н            нин
SFX 29   ин   ы            рин
SFX 29   ин   е            нин
SFX 29   ин   ами          ин
SFX 29   ин   ам           ин
SFX 29   ин   ах           ин
SFX 29   ий   ья           ий
SFX 29   ий   ьими         ий
SFX 29   ий   ьим          ий
SFX 29   ий   ьих          ий
SFX 29   ий   ьи           ий
SFX 29   ий   ьему         ий
SFX 29   ий   ьем          ий
SFX 29   ий   ьей          ий
SFX 29   ий   ьего         ий
SFX 29   ий   ье           ий
SFX 29   ий   ью           ий
SFX 29   и    ями          [арс]ти
SFX 29   и    ями          [абеилнорсь]и
SFX 29   и    ям           [абдеилнорсть]и
SFX 29   и    ях           [абдеилнорсть]и
SFX 29   и    ами          [^абдеилнорсть]и
SFX 29   и    ам           [^абдеилнорсть]и
SFX 29   и    ах           [^абдеилнорсть]и
SFX 29   ень  нями         ень
SFX 29   ень  ням          ень
SFX 29   ень  нях          ень
SFX 29   ень  ня           ень
SFX 29   ень  ни           ень
SFX 29   ень  нем          ень
SFX 29   ень  ней          ень
SFX 29   ень  не           ень
SFX 29   ень  ню           ень
SFX 29   ел   лы           ел
SFX 29   ел   лу           ел
SFX 29   ел   лов          ел
SFX 29   ел   лом          ел
SFX 29   ел   ле           ел
SFX 29   ел   лами         ел
SFX 29   ел   лам          ел
SFX 29   ел   лах          ел
SFX 29   ел   ла           ел
SFX 29   ек   ьку          [лнрс]ек
SFX 29   ек   ьков         [лнрс]ек
SFX 29   ек   ьком         [лнрс]ек
SFX 29   ек   ьки          [лнрс]ек
SFX 29   ек   ьке          [лнрс]ек
SFX 29   ек   ьками        [лнрс]ек
SFX 29   ек   ькам         [лнрс]ек
SFX 29   ек   ьках         [лнрс]ек
SFX 29   ек   ька          [лнрс]ек
SFX 29   ек   ку           [жшч]ек
SFX 29   ек   ков          [жшч]ек
SFX 29   ек   ком          [жшч]ек
SFX 29   ек   ки           [жшч]ек
SFX 29   ек   ке           [жшч]ек
SFX 29   ек   ками         [жшч]ек
SFX 29   ек   кам          [жшч]ек
SFX 29   ек   ках          [жшч]ек
SFX 29   ек   ка           [жшч]ек
SFX 29   ец   ьцы          лец
SFX 29   ец   ьцу          лец
SFX 29   ец   ьце          лец
SFX 29   ец   ьцами        лец
SFX 29   ец   ьцам         лец
SFX 29   ец   ьцах         лец
SFX 29   ец   ьца          лец
SFX 29   ец   йцы          [аеио]ец
SFX 29   ец   йцу          [аеио]ец
SFX 29   ец   йцев         [аеи]ец
SFX 29   ец   йцем         [аеи]ец
SFX 29   ец   йце          [аеио]ец
SFX 29   ец   йцами        [аеио]ец
SFX 29   ец   йцам         [аеио]ец
SFX 29   ец   йцах         [аеио]ец
SFX 29   ец   йца          [аеио]ец
SFX 29   ец   цы           [^аеило]ец
SFX 29   ец   цу           [^аеило]ец
SFX 29   ец   це           [^аеило]ец
SFX 29   ец   цами         [^аеило]ец
SFX 29   ец   цам          [^аеило]ец
SFX 29   ец   цах          [^аеило]ец
SFX 29   ец   ца           [^аеило]ец
SFX 29   ёл   лы           ёл
SFX 29   ёл   лу           ёл
SFX 29   ёл   лов          ёл
SFX 29   ёл   лом          ёл
SFX 29   ёл   ле           ёл
SFX 29   ёл   лами         ёл
SFX 29   ёл   лам          ёл
SFX 29   ёл   лах          ёл
SFX 29   ёл   ла           ёл
SFX 29   ёк   ьку          [лнрс]ёк
SFX 29   ёк   ьков         [лнрс]ёк
SFX 29   ёк   ьком         [лнрс]ёк
SFX 29   ёк   ьки          [лнрс]ёк
SFX 29   ёк   ьке          [лнрс]ёк
SFX 29   ёк   ьками        [лнрс]ёк
SFX 29   ёк   ькам         [лнрс]ёк
SFX 29   ёк   ьках         [лнрс]ёк
SFX 29   ёк   ька          [лнрс]ёк
SFX 29   0    у            ин
SFX 29   0    ом           ин
SFX 29   0    ми           [ая]
SFX 29   0    м            [ая]
SFX 29   0    х            [ая]
SFX 29   0    ев           [аняр]ц
SFX 29   0    е            ин
SFX 29   0    а            ин

SFX 30 Y 3
SFX 30   y     iness      [^aeiou]y
SFX 30   0     ness       [aeiou]y
SFX 30   0     ness       [^y]

SFX 31 Y 12
SFX 31   ыться оясь         ыться
SFX 31   ыть  оя           ыть
SFX 31   ться сь           [аеоу]яться
SFX 31   ться ясь          [ае]ться
SFX 31   ться ясь          [^аеоу]яться
SFX 31   ть   я            [ае]ть
SFX 31   ть   я            [^аеоу]ять
SFX 31   ять  я            [аеоу]ять
SFX 31   иться ясь          [^жшщч]иться
SFX 31   иться ась          [жшщч]иться
SFX 31   ить  я            [^жшщч]ить
SFX 31   ить  а            [жшщч]ить

SFX 32 Y 6
SFX 32   оваться уясь         оваться
SFX 32   овать уя           овать
SFX 32   еваться уясь         [цжшщч]еваться
SFX 32   еваться юясь         [^цжшщч]еваться
SFX 32   евать уя           [цжшщч]евать
SFX 32   евать юя           [^цжшщч]евать

SFX 33 Y 4
SFX 33   0     r          e
SFX 33   y     ier        [^aeiou]y
SFX 33   0     er         [aeiou]y
SFX 33   0     er         [^ey]

SFX 34 Y 4
SFX 34   ться вшись        [аеиояуы]ться
SFX 34   ть   в            [аеиояуы]ть
SFX 34   сться вшись        сться
SFX 34   сть  в            сть

SFX 35 Y 4
SFX 35   y     ies        [^aeiou]y
SFX 35   0     s          [aeiou]y
SFX 35   0     es         [sxzh]
SFX 35   0     s          [^sxzhy]

SFX 36 Y 40
SFX 36   ый   ы            [^н]ый
SFX 36   ый   о            [^н]ый
SFX 36   ый   а            [^н]ый
SFX 36   ый   0            [^н]ый
SFX 36   ьный ен           ьный
SFX 36   ький ек           ький
SFX 36   ой   ы            [^гх]ой
SFX 36   ой   о            ой
SFX 36   ой   и            [гх]ой
SFX 36   ой   а            ой
SFX 36   ой   0            ой
SFX 36   ный  ы            нный
SFX 36   ный  ы            [^ё]нный
SFX 36   ный  он           лный
SFX 36   ный  о            нный
SFX 36   ный  о            [^ё]нный
SFX 36   ный  ны           [^н]ный
SFX 36   ный  но           [^н]ный
SFX 36   ный  на           [^н]ный
SFX 36   ный  н            еный
SFX 36   ный  н            [ёе]ный
SFX 36   ный  ен           [^ейлнь]ный
SFX 36   ный  ен           [^ёейлнь]ный
SFX 36   ный  а            нный
SFX 36   ный  а            [^ё]нный
SFX 36   нный н            нный
SFX 36   кий  ок           [^аеийоуьы]кий
SFX 36   кий  ок           [^ёаеийоуьы]кий
SFX 36   кий  к            [аеиоуы]кий
SFX 36   кий  к            [ёаеиоуы]кий
SFX 36   йный ен           йный
SFX 36   йкий ек           йкий
SFX 36   ий   о            [гхк]ий
SFX 36   ий   и            [гхкжщч]ий
SFX 36   ий   е            [жщч]ий
SFX 36   ий   а            [гхкжщч]ий
SFX 36   ий   0            [гхжщч]ий
SFX 36   ённый ены          ённый
SFX 36   ённый ено          ённый
SFX 36   ённый ена          ённый

SFX 37 N 4
SFX 37   0     st         e
SFX 37   y     iest       [^aeiou]y
SFX 37   0     est        [aeiou]y
SFX 37   0     est        [^ey]

SFX 38 Y 38
SFX 38   уться ьтесь        уться
SFX 38   уться ься          уться
SFX 38   уть  ьте          уть
SFX 38   уть  ь            уть
SFX 38   саться шитесь       саться
SFX 38   саться шись         саться
SFX 38   сать шите         сать
SFX 38   сать ши           сать
SFX 38   яться йтесь        [аеоу]яться
SFX 38   яться йся          [аеоу]яться
SFX 38   ять  йте          [аеоу]ять
SFX 38   ять  й            [аеоу]ять
SFX 38   оваться уйтесь       оваться
SFX 38   оваться уйся         оваться
SFX 38   овать уйте         овать
SFX 38   овать уй           овать
SFX 38   иться ьтесь        [^аео]иться
SFX 38   иться ься          [^аео]иться
SFX 38   иться йтесь        [аео]иться
SFX 38   иться йся          [аео]иться
SFX 38   ить  ьте          [^аео]ить
SFX 38   ить  ь            [^аео]ить
SFX 38   ить  йте          [аео]ить
SFX 38   ить  й            [аео]ить
SFX 38   еваться уйтесь       [цжшщч]еваться
SFX 38   еваться уйся         [цжшщч]еваться
SFX 38   еваться юйтесь       [^цжшщч]еваться
SFX 38   еваться юйся         [^цжшщч]еваться
SFX 38   евать уйте         [цжшщч]евать
SFX 38   евать уй           [цжшщч]евать
SFX 38   евать юйте         [^цжшщч]евать
SFX 38   евать юй           [^цжшщч]евать
SFX 38   еться итесь        еться
SFX 38   еться ись          еться
SFX 38   еть  ите          еть
SFX 38   еть  и            еть
SFX 38   аться ись          [жч]аться
SFX 38   ать  и            [жч]ать
